apertium-bho.bho.dix
	<pardef n="य/_है__det">
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>है</l><r><b/>है<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>है</l><r><b/>है<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  	<e><p><l>े<b/>है</l><r><b/>है<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>े<b/>है</l><r><b/>है<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>है</l><r><b/>है<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="य/_सब__det">
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  	<e><p><l>े<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>े<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ह<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>	

	<pardef n="पिछल/_वाला__det">
        <e><p><l>ा<b/>वाला</l><r><b/>वाला<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ा<b/>वाला</l><r><b/>वाला<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>े<b/>वाले</l><r><b/>वाला<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>े<b/>वाले</l><r><b/>वाला<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ा<b/>वाला</l><r><b/>वाला<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

	<pardef n="उ/_सब__det">
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	    <e><p><l>न<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>न<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>स<b/>सब</l><r><b/>सब<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <!--NUMERALS-->

    <pardef n="एक__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="दोसर__num">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="पहिल/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>
 
	  <pardef n="आठव/ाँ__adj">
      <e><p><l>ाँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ें</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ें</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ीँ</l><r>ाँ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef> 

    <!--PRONOUNS-->
 
    <pardef n = "ह/म__prn"> 
      <e><p><l>म</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>म</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>मसे</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>    	
      <e><p><l>में</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>मरा</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>     
      <e><p><l>मरा</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n= "p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>     
      <e><p><l>नी</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>     
      <e><p><l>नीके</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>हूँ</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n = "/तुंह__prn" > 
       <e><p><l>तुंह</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुंह</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहरासों</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>      	
       <e><p><l>तुहरे</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहरे</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहर</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहर</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहनीके</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>       
       <e><p><l>तुहराके</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहरमें</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>      
 
       <e><p><l>तोहनी</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तोहनी</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहरासों</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>      	
       <e><p><l>तुहार</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहार</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहार</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/> <s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहनीके</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>       
       <e><p><l>तुहराके</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>      
       <e><p><l>तुहरामें</l><r>तुंह<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>                 
     </pardef>

    <e lm="तिरासी"><i>तिरासी</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="एक सौ"><i>एक सौ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पचासी"><i>पचासी</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="छत्तीस"><i>छत्तीस</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="त्रेसठ"><i>त्रेसठ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सात सौ"><i>सात सौ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्नीस"><i>उन्नीस</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सतत्तर"><i>सतत्तर</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पंचानवे"><i>पंचानवे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="नव्वे"><i>नव्वे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उनचास"><i>उनचास</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उनासी"><i>उनासी</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="अतन्ना"><i>अतन्ना</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तेंतीस"><i>तेंतीस</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इक्यानबे"><i>इक्यानबे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="आठ सौ"><i>आठ सौ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दो सौ"><i>दो सौ</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="बानबे"><i>बानबे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="छियानबे"><i>छियानबे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="चौबीस"><i>चौबीस</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="नौसो"><i>नौसो</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="छे"><i>छे</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="दो-चार"><i>दो-चार</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="वन"><i>वन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="शुन्य"><i>शुन्य</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="ऐगो"><i>ऐगो</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="एक__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="नौ"><i>नौ</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तेरह"><i>तेरह</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्रह"><i>सत्रह</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इक्किस"><i>इक्किस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पच्चीस"><i>पच्चीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उनतीस"><i>उनतीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तैंतीस"><i>तैंतीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सैंतीस"><i>सैंतीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इकतालीस"><i>इकतालीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पैंतालीस"><i>पैंतालीस</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्चास"><i>उन्चास</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरेपन"><i>तिरेपन</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पचपन"><i>पचपन</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उनसठ"><i>उनसठ</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तिरेसठ"><i>तिरेसठ</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सड़सठ"><i>सड़सठ</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इकहत्तर"><i>इकहत्तर</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पचहत्तर"><i>पचहत्तर</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्यासी"><i>उन्यासी</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="तेरासी"><i>तेरासी</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="सतासी"><i>सतासी</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="इक्यानवे"><i>इक्यानवे</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पचानवे"><i>पचानवे</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="निन्यानवे"><i>निन्यानवे</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="हज़ार"><i>हज़ार</i><par n="दोसर__num"/></e>
    <e lm="पहिला"><i>पहिल</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दोसरा"><i>दोसर</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तीसरा"><i>तीसर</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चौथा"><i>चौथ</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छठा"><i>छठ</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सातवा"><i>सातव</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आठवाँ"><i>आठव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नौंवा"><i>नौंव</i><par n="पहिल/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दसवाँ"><i>दसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ग्यारहवाँ"><i>ग्यारहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बारहवाँ"><i>बारहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तेरहवाँ"><i>तेरहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चौदहवाँ"><i>चौदहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पन्द्रहवाँ"><i>पन्द्रहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सोलहवाँ"><i>सोलहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्तरहवाँ"><i>सत्तरहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अठारहवाँ"><i>अठारहव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्नीसवाँ"><i>उन्नीसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बीसवाँ"><i>बीसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="इक्कीसवाँ"><i>इक्कीसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चालीसवाँ"><i>चालीसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पचासवाँ"><i>पचासव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साठवाँ"><i>साठव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अस्सीवाँ"><i>अस्सीव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तीसवाँ"><i>तीसव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्तरवाँ"><i>सत्तरव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नब्बेवाँ"><i>नब्बेव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सौंवाँ"><i>सौंव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हज़ारवाँ"><i>हज़ारव</i><par n="आठव/ाँ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="य है"><i>य</i><par n="य/_है__det"/></e>
    <e lm="य सब"><i>य</i><par n="य/_सब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उ सब"><i>उ</i><par n="उ/_सब__det"/></e>
    <e lm="पिछल वाला"><i>पिछल</i><par n="पिछल/_वाला__det"/></e>
